Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska70-307
Placement of lines; violation; penalty.

If any person engaged in distributing, generating, or transmitting electric current for power or other purposes by means of wires constructs or places electric wires over the railroad tracks, telegraph wires, or rights-of-way of any railroad company in violation of section 70-305, section 75-708 shall apply.

Laws 1903, c. 117, § 1, p. 608;

R.S.1913, § 7420;

Laws 1917, c. 135, § 1, p. 320;

Laws 1921, c. 259, § 1, p. 874;

C.S.1922, § 7099;

C.S.1929, § 86-303;

Laws 1943, c. 231, § 2, p. 780;

R.S.1943, § 86-307;

R.S.1943, (1999), § 86-307;

Laws 2002, LB 1105, § 470.